Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 540.510 is amended to read:
540.510. (1)(a) Except as provided in subsections (2) to (8) of this section, all water used  in this
state for any purpose shall remain appurtenant to the premises upon which it is  used and no change
in use or place of use of any water for any purpose may be made without compliance with the pro-
visions of ORS 540.520 and 540.530. However, the holder of any water use subject  to transfer may,
upon compliance  with the provisions of ORS 540.520 and 540.530, change the use and place of use,
the point of diversion or  the use [ theretofore made ] of the water [ in all cases ] without losing priority
of the right [ theretofore established ]. A district may change the place of use in the manner  provided
in ORS 540.572 to 540.580 in lieu of the method provided in ORS  540.520 and 540.530. When an ap-
plication for change of the use or place  of use for a primary water right is submitted in accordance
with this section, the applicant also shall indicate whether the land described in the application has
an appurtenant supplemental  water right or permit. If the applicant also intends to transfer the
supplemental water right  or permit, the applicant also shall include the information required under
ORS 540.520 (2) for the supplemental water right or permit.  If the applicant does not include the
supplemental water right or permit in the transfer  application, the Water Resources Department
shall notify the  applicant that the supplemental water right or permit will be canceled before the
department issues the order approving the transfer of  the primary water right, unless within 30 days
the applicant modifies the application to include the supplemental water right or  permit or with-
draws the application. The department may approve the transfer  of the supplemental water right or
permit in accordance with the provisions of ORS 540.520 and 540.530. The  department shall not ap-
prove the transfer of a supplemental  water right or permit if the transfer would result in enlarge-
ment of the original water right or injury to an existing water right. If the department approves  the
transfer of the primary water right but does not approve the transfer of  the supplemental water
right or permit, the department shall notify the applicant of the department’s  intent to cancel that
portion  of  the supplemental water right or permit described in the transfer application before the
department issues the primary water right transfer order, unless  the applicant withdraws the
transfer application within 90 days.
(b) A holder of a water right certificate that authorizes the storage of water may change
the type of use  identified in the water right certificate, as described in subsection (1)(a) of
this section, without losing priority of the right.
Enrolled House Bill 3103 (HB 3103-A) Page 1
(2) Subject  to the limitations in ORS 537.490, any right to the use of conserved water allocated
by the Water Resources Commission under ORS 537.470 may be severed from  the land and trans-
ferred or sold after notice to the commission as required under ORS 537.490.
(3)(a) Any water used  under a permit or certificate issued to a municipality, or under rights
conferred  by  ORS 538.410 to 538.450, or under the registration system set forth in ORS 537.132, may
be applied to beneficial use on lands to which the right is not appurtenant if:
(A) The water is applied to lands which are acquired by annexation or through  merger, consol-
idation or formation of a water authority, so long as the rate and use of water allowed in  the ori-
ginal certificate is not exceeded;
(B) The  use continues to be for municipal purposes and would not interfere with or impair prior
vested water rights; or
(C) The use is authorized under a permit  granted under ORS 468B.050 or 468B.053 and for which
a reclaimed water registration form has been filed under ORS 537.132.
(b) As used in this subsection, “municipality” means  a city, a port formed under ORS 777.005 to
777.725, 777.915 to 777.953 and 778.010, a domestic water supply district formed  under ORS chapter
264, a water supplier as defined in ORS 448.115 or a water  authority formed under ORS chapter 450.
(4) Pursuant to the provisions of ORS 540.570 or 540.585, any  water used under a permit or
certificate issued to a district  may be applied to beneficial use on lands within the district to which
the right is not appurtenant.
(5) The relocation of a point of diversion as necessary to  follow the movements of a naturally
changing  stream  channel does not constitute a change in point of diversion for purposes of ORS
540.520 if:
(a) The diversion point stays within 500 feet of the point of diversion on  record with the Water
Resources  Department;
(b) The change does not move the diversion point upstream or downstream beyond the  diversion
point of another appropriator; and
(c) The diversion is provided with a proper fish screen, if  requested by the State Department
of Fish and Wildlife.
(6) In the event that government action results  in or creates a reasonable expectation of a
change in the surface level of a surface water source that impairs or threatens to  impair access to
a point of diversion authorized by a water  right permit, certificate or decree, the owner of the water
right may change the point of diversion or  add an additional point of diversion in accordance with
the provisions of this section in lieu of complying with the  requirements of ORS 540.520 and 540.530.
Before changing the point of diversion, the water right owner  shall provide written notice of the
proposed change to the Water Resources Department. Within  15 days after receipt of such notice,
the department shall provide notice by publication in  the department’s public notice of water right
applications. Within 60 days after the department receives notice from the owner, the Water Re-
sources  Director,  by order, shall approve the change unless the director finds the changes will result
in injury to other existing water rights. All  other terms and conditions of the water right shall re-
main in effect.
(7) The sale or lease of the right to the use of conserved water  under ORS 537.490 does not
constitute a change of use or a change in the place of use of water for purposes of ORS 540.520.
(8) Ground water applied  to an exempt use as set forth in ORS 537.141 or 537.545 may be sub-
sequently applied to land for irrigation purposes under  ORS 537.141 (1)(i) or 537.545 (1)(g) without
application for a change in use or place of use under this section.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 540.520 is amended to read:
540.520. (1)(a) Except when  the application is made under ORS 541.327 or when an application
for a temporary transfer  is made under ORS 540.523, if the holder of a water use subject to transfer
for irrigation, domestic use, manufacturing purposes, or other use, for any  reason desires to change
the place of use, the point of diversion, or  the use made of the water, an application to make such
change, as the case may be, shall be filed with the Water Resources Department.
Enrolled House Bill 3103 (HB 3103-A) Page 2
(b) A holder of a water right certificate that authorizes the storage of water may change
the type of use identified in the water right certificate, as described in this section.
(2) The application required under subsection (1) of this section shall include:
(a) The name of the owner;
(b) The previous use of the water;
(c) A description of the premises upon which the water is used;
(d) A description of the premises upon which it is proposed to use the water;
(e) The use that is proposed to be made of the water;
(f) The reasons for making the proposed change; and
(g) Evidence that the water has been used over the  past five years according to the terms and
conditions of the owner’s water right certificate or that the water right  is not subject to forfeiture
under ORS 540.610.
(3) If the application required under subsection (1) of this  section is necessary to allow a change
in a water right pursuant to  ORS 537.348, is necessary to complete a project funded under ORS
541.932, or is approved by the State Department of Fish  and Wildlife as a change that will result in
a net benefit to fish  and wildlife habitat, the department, at the discretion of the Water Resources
Director, may waive or assist the applicant in satisfying the requirements of  subsection (2)(c) and
(d) of this section. The assistance provided by the department may include, but  need not be limited
to, development of an application map.
(4) If the application is to change the point of diversion, the transfer shall include a condition
that the holder of the water right provide a proper fish  screen at the new point of diversion, if re-
quested by the State Department of Fish and Wildlife.
(5) Upon the filing of the application the department shall give notice by  publication in a
newspaper having general circulation in the area in which the water rights are  located, for a period
of at least two weeks and not less than one  publication each week. The notice shall include the date
on which the last notice by publication will occur. The cost of the publication  shall be paid by the
applicant in advance to the department.  In applications for only a change in place of use or for a
change in the point of diversion of less than one-fourth mile, and where there are  no intervening
diversions  between  the old diversion of the applicant and the proposed new diversion, no newspaper
notice need be published. The department shall include notice of such  applications in the weekly
notice published by the department.
(6) Within 30 days after the last publication of a newspaper notice of the proposed transfer or
the mailing of the department’s weekly notice, whichever is  later, any person may file, jointly or
severally, with the department, a protest against approval of the application.
(7) If a timely protest is filed, or in  the opinion of the Water Resources Director a hearing is
necessary to determine whether the proposed changes as  described by the application would result
in injury to existing water rights, the department shall hold a hearing on  the matter. Notice and
conduct of the hearing shall be  under the provisions of ORS chapter 183, pertaining to contested
cases, and shall be held in the  area where the rights are located unless all parties and persons who
filed a protest under this subsection stipulate otherwise.
(8) An application for a change of use under this section is not required if  the beneficial use
authorized by the water use subject to transfer is  irrigation and the owner of the water right uses
the water for incidental agricultural,  stock watering and other uses related to irrigation use, so long
as there is no increase in the rate, duty, total acreage benefited or season of use.
(9) A water right transfer under subsection (1) of this section is not required for a  general in-
dustrial use that was not included in a water right certificate issued for  a specific industrial use if:
(a) The quantity of  water used for the general industrial use is not greater than the rate allowed
in the original water right and  not greater than the quantity of water diverted to satisfy the au-
thorized specific use under the original water right;
(b) The location where the water is to be used for general  industrial use was owned by the
holder of the original water right at the time the water right permit was issued; and
Enrolled House Bill 3103 (HB 3103-A) Page 3
(c) The person who makes the change in  water use provides the following information to the
Water Resources Department:
(A) The name and mailing address of the person using water under the water right;
(B) The water right certificate number;
(C) A description of the location of the industrial facility owned by the holder  of the original
water right at the time the water right permit was issued; and
(D) A description of the general industrial use to be made of the water after the change.
SECTION 3.
For the purpose of finding agreement among stakeholders on  a path forward
for transfers of stored water and development  of related legislative proposals, the Water
Resources Commission shall:
(1) Engage professional facilitation services.
(2) Seek a facilitator with national renown and subject matter expertise.
(3) Retain, if possible, a senior lead facilitator and a junior support facilitator.
(4) Hold six to 12 meetings, in person if practicable, with at least 20  diverse stakeholders,
including from federal and state  agencies, between the effective date of this 2021 Act and
June 30, 2023.
(5) Design a  process for the meetings and conduct stakeholder interviews and research
before the meetings.
SECTION 4.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the Water Resources Commission, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021,  out of the
General Fund, the amount of $485,100 to be used to carry out the provisions of section 3 of
this 2021 Act.
Passed by House June 24, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 26, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3103 (HB 3103-A) Page 4